Illinois, session 104th, HB2835.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Department of Agriculture Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing Section 6205-1 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 205/205-1)8    Sec. 205-1. Article short title. This Article 205 of the 9the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois may be cited as the 10Department of Agriculture Law.11(Source: P.A. 91-239, eff. 1-1-00.)